Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-730
Equipment; installation; notice to commissioner; reinspection.

Before any boiler required to be inspected by the Boiler Inspection Act is installed, a ten days' written notice of intention to install the boiler shall be given to the commissioner, except that the commissioner may, upon application and good cause shown, waive the ten-day prior notice requirement. The notice shall designate the proposed place of installation, the type and capacity of the boiler, the use to be made of the boiler, the name of the company which manufactured the boiler, and whether the boiler is new or used. A boiler moved from one location to another shall be reinspected prior to being placed back into use.

Laws 1943, c. 112, § 5, p. 394;

R.S.1943, § 48-710;

R.S.1943, (1984), § 48-710;

Laws 1987, LB 462, § 12;

Laws 1995, LB 438, § 9;

Laws 1998, LB 395, § 16;

Laws 2007, LB226, § 3.